Tennessee, session 114, HB2026.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 39, Chapter 17, Part 1, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
(a) As used in this section:
(1) "Geodetic control monument" means a land surveying monument
established by licensed professional land surveyors and governmental agencies.
A geodetic control monument may be in the form of, but is not limited to, a metal
pin, aluminum disk, brass disk, or other permanent or semi-permanent object, set
in soil, concrete, or rock, and must be marked as a control point or with "do not
disturb" or other language to identify the monument's purpose;
(2) "Historic land surveying monument" means a land surveying
monument established by federal, state, or local governments establishing a
state boundary line, county boundary line, or city boundary line; and
(3) "Property corner monument" means a land surveying monument
established by a licensed professional land surveyor to identify property corners
or property lines, the location and description of which are described in a
recorded document in the register of deeds office of any county in this state. A
property corner monument may be any permanent or semi-permanent object,
including, but not limited to:
(A) Iron or steel pipes, rebar, spikes, nails, or rods;
HB2026
011142
- 1 -

(B) Concrete markers, including highway right-of-way markers;
(C) Stone or rock, whether natural or set;
(D) Trees, stumps, or temporary wooden stakes;
(E) Markings or scribes made on trees, concrete, or metal; and
(F) Such other monuments as may be described in deeds, on
plats, and in other instruments of record.
(b)
(1) It is an offense for a person to intentionally move without replacing,
alter, destroy, or remove a monument the person knows, or reasonably should
know, is a property corner monument, historic land surveying monument, or
geodetic control monument.
(2) A violation of subdivision (b)(1) is a Class A misdemeanor.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 011142